Maryland, session 2026, HB0310.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Correctional Services
9–614.3.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CLINICAL PROFESSIONAL” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS
TRAINED AND OR LICENSED IN MENTAL HEALTH.
(3) “DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
7–101 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(4) “INTELLECTUAL DISABILITY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
7–101 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(5) “PROHIBITED ACT” INCLUDES:
(I) CAUSING OR ATTEMPTING TO CAUSE SERIOUS PHYSICAL
INJURY TO OR DEATH OF ANOTHER PERSON;
(II) MAKING AN IMMINENT THREAT OF SERIOUS PHYSICAL
INJURY OR DEATH TO ANOTHER PERSON WHEN:
1. THE INDIVIDUAL MAKING THE THREAT HAS A
HISTORY OF CAUSING PHYSICAL INJURY OR DEATH; AND
2. THE COMMISSIONER OF CORRECTION REASONABLY
DETERMINES THAT THERE IS A STRONG LIKELIHOOD THAT THE PERSON WILL CARRY
OUT A THREAT OF SERIOUS PHYSICAL INJURY OR DEATH;
(III) COMPELLING OR ATTEMPTING TO COMPEL ANOTHER
PERSON, BY FORCE OR THREAT OF FORCE, TO ENGAGE IN A SEXUAL ACT;
(IV) EXTORTING ANOTHER, BY FORCE OR THREAT OF FORCE,
FOR PROPERTY OR MONEY;
(V) COERCING ANOTHER, BY FORCE OR THREAT OF FORCE, TO
VIOLATE A RULE;

HOUSE BILL 310 3
(VI) LEADING, ORGANIZING, INCITING, OR ATTEMPTING TO
CAUSE A RIOT, AN INSURRECTION, OR ANY OTHER SIMILARLY SERIOUS
DISTURBANCE THAT RESULTS IN THE TAKING OF A HOSTAGE, MAJOR PROPERTY
DAMAGE, OR PHYSICAL HARM TO ANOTHER PERSON;
(VII) PROCURING DEADLY WEAPONS OR OTHER DANGEROUS
CONTRABAND THAT POSE A SERIOUS THREAT TO THE SECURITY OF THE
INSTITUTION; AND
(VIII) ESCAPING, ATTEMPTING TO ESCAPE, OR FACILITATING AN
ESCAPE FROM A CORRECTIONAL FACILITY OR ESCAPING OR ATTEMPTING TO
ESCAPE WHILE UNDER SUPERVISION OUTSIDE A CORRECTIONAL FACILITY.
(6) (I) “RESTRICTIVE HOUSING” MEANS A FORM OF PHYSICAL
SEPARATION THAT HAS NOT BEEN REQUESTED BY THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL
IN WHICH THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL IS PLACED IN A LOCKED ROOM OR CELL
FOR APPROXIMATELY 22 HOURS OR MORE OUT OF A 24–HOUR PERIOD.
(II) “RESTRICTIVE HOUSING” INCLUDES ADMINISTRATIVE
SEGREGATION AND DISCIPLINARY SEGREGATION.
(III) “RESTRICTIVE HOUSING” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
1. MEDICAL ISOLATION;
2. MENTAL–HEALTH OBSERVATION OR CRISIS
STABILIZATION;
3. SUICIDE WATCH;
4. PROTECTIVE CUSTODY REQUESTED BY THE
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL; OR
5. QUARANTINE OR PUBLIC–HEALTH ISOLATION.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO A STATE CORRECTIONAL FACILITY.
(C) (1) DURING THE INTAKE ASSESSMENT MEDICAL SCREENING
CONDUCTED ON ADMISSION TO A STATE CORRECTIONAL FACILITY FOR A NEW
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL, AN APPLICABLE CLINICAL PROFESSIONAL MAY SHALL,
AS PART OF THE STANDARD INTAKE SCREENING PROCESS, ASSESS THE
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL FOR INDICATORS OF A DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITY
OR AN INTELLECTUAL DISABILITY.

HOUSE BILL 310
(2) (I) BASED ON THE ASSESSMENT UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION, THE CLINICAL PROFESSIONAL MAY RECOMMEND TO THE
CORRECTIONAL FACILITY THAT THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL SHOULD NOT BE
PLACED IN RESTRICTIVE HOUSING FOR MORE THAN 15 CONSECUTIVE DAYS IN A
30–DAY PERIOD.
(II) IF A CLINICAL PROFESSIONAL MAKES A RECOMMENDATION
DESCRIBED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE CORRECTIONAL
FACILITY MAY NOT PLACE AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL IN RESTRICTIVE
HOUSING FOR MORE THAN 15 CONSECUTIVE DAYS IN A 30–DAY PERIOD.
(D) THE 15 CONSECUTIVE DAY LIMIT ON RESTRICTIVE HOUSING UNDER
THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL WHO COMMITS
A PROHIBITED ACT.
Article – Health – General
7–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(g) “Developmental disability” means a severe chronic disability of an individual
that:
(1) Is attributable to a physical or mental impairment, other than the sole
diagnosis of mental illness, or to a combination of mental and physical impairments;
(2) Is manifested before the individual attains the age of 22;
(3) Is likely to continue indefinitely;
(4) Results in an inability to live independently without external support
or continuing and regular assistance; and
(5) Reflects the need for a combination and sequence of special,
interdisciplinary, or generic care, treatment, or other services that are individually planned
and coordinated for the individual.
(n) “Intellectual disability” means a developmental disability that is evidenced by
significantly subaverage intellectual functioning and impairment in the adaptive behavior
of an individual.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.